Florida, session 2026, SB1338.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 50 51 Section 1.âSection 496.432, Florida Statutes, is created to 52 read: 53 496.432âSafeguarding Endowment Gifts Act.â 54 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.âThe Legislature finds that it is 55 necessary to provide legal recourse to individual charitable 56 donors when their giving restrictions are not followed by a 57 recipient charitable organization according to an endowment 58 agreement. 59 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 60 (a)ââCharitable organizationâ means an organization 61 organized and operated exclusively for religious, charitable, 62 scientific, literary, educational, testing for public safety, or 63 other specified purposes and that is tax exempt from federal 64 income tax as an entity described in s. 501(c)(3) of the 65 Internal Revenue Code. 66 (b)ââDonorâ means an individual or entity that has made a 67 contribution of property or money to an existing endowment fund 68 or a new endowment fund of a charitable organization pursuant to 69 the terms of an endowment agreement that may include donor 70 imposed restrictions governing the contribution. 71 (c)ââDonor-imposed restrictionâ means a written statement 72 within an endowment agreement which specifies restrictions or 73 conditions on the management, investment, purpose, or use of 74 endowment funds. 75 (d)ââEndowment agreementâ means a written agreement between 76 a charitable organization and a donor regarding the contribution 77 made by the donor to an existing endowment fund or a new 78 endowment fund of a charitable organization, which agreement may 79 include donor-imposed restrictions. 80 (e)ââEndowment fundâ means a fund held exclusively for a 81 charitable purpose, other than program-related assets, or part 82 thereof which, under the terms of a gift instrument, is not 83 wholly expendable by the charitable organization on a current 84 basis. The term does not include assets that a charitable 85 organization designates as an endowment fund for its own use. 86 (f)ââGift instrumentâ means a record or records, including 87 a charitable solicitation, under which property is granted to, 88 transferred to, or held by a charitable organization as a fund 89 held exclusively by a charitable purpose, other than program 90 related assets. 91 (g)ââLegal representativeâ means the administrator or 92 personal representative of a personâs estate, or a person 93 designated in an endowment agreement, whether or not born at the 94 time of such designation, to act in place of a party to the 95 agreement for all matters expressed in the agreement and all of 96 the actions it contemplates, including, but not limited to, 97 interpreting, performing, and enforcing the agreement and 98 defending its validity. 99 (h)ââPropertyâ means real property, tangible or intangible 100 personal property, or any other asset. 101 (3)âPROTECTIONS AFFORDED.â 102 (a)âExcept where specifically required or authorized by 103 federal or state law, a charitable organization that accepts a 104 contribution pursuant to a written donor-imposed restriction may 105 not violate the terms of that restriction. 106 (b)âIf a charitable organization violates a donor-imposed 107 restriction contained in an endowment agreement, the donor, or 108 the donorâs legal representative, 90 days after notifying the 109 charitable organization of the breach, may file a complaint 110 within 5 years after discovery for breach of such agreement. The 111 complaint may be filed in the circuit court where a charitable 112 organizationâs principal office is or was last located or, if 113 none, where its registered office is or was last located. The 114 complaint may be filed regardless of whether the endowment 115 agreement expressly reserves a right to sue or enforce the 116 agreement, unless other language in the endowment agreement 117 expressly waives this right. The complaint may not seek a 118 judgment awarding damages to the donor or donor representative, 119 but it may seek a refund of all or a portion of the donated 120 funds if the donor expressly reserved a right to a refund in the 121 endowment agreement. 122 (c)âIf a charitable organization determines in accordance 123 with its internal policies that it is unable to fulfill a term 124 in the endowment agreement, the charitable organization must 125 notify the donor, or the donorâs legal representative, within 126 120 days after such determination that it is unable to fulfill 127 the terms and must offer an alternative solution that closely 128 matches the initial term in the endowment agreement, unless 129 other language in the endowment agreement limits this 130 requirement. 131 (d)âA charitable organization may obtain a judicial 132 declaration of the rights and duties expressed in an endowment 133 agreement containing donor-imposed restrictions as to all of the 134 actions the endowment agreement contemplates, including, but not 135 limited to, the interpretation, performance, or enforcement of 136 the agreement, and a determination of its validity. The 137 charitable organization may seek a judicial declaration in any 138 suit brought under this section, or by filing a complaint. 139 (e)âIf the court determines that a charitable organization 140 violated a donor-imposed restriction in an endowment agreement, 141 the court may order one or more remedies consistent with the 142 charitable purposes expressed in the endowment agreement. The 143 court may not order the return of donated funds to the donor or 144 the donorâs legal representative unless a right to a refund is 145 expressly reserved by the donor in the endowment agreement. 146 (f)âThis act does not affect the authority of the Attorney 147 General to enforce any restriction in an endowment agreement; 148 limit the application of the judicial power of cy pres; or alter 149 the right of a charitable organization to modify a restriction 150 on the management, investment, purpose, or use of an endowment 151 fund in a manner expressly permitted by the donor in the 152 endowment agreement or in a manner permitted by the Florida 153 Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act created in 154 s. 617.2104. 155 (4)âSEVERABILITY.âIf any provision of this section or its 156 application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the 157 invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of 158 the section which can be given effect without the invalid 159 provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this 160 section are declared severable. 161 Section 2.âSection 496.433, Florida Statutes, is created to 162 read: 163 496.433âCharity Protection Act.â 164 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.âThe Legislature finds that it is 165 necessary to minimize burdens on the charitable sector and to 166 create a grantmaking environment centered on effectiveness and 167 fiscal impact on charitable organizations. 168 (2)âPROTECTIONS AFFORDED.â 169 (a)âExcept where specifically required or authorized by 170 federal law, a state agency or state official may not impose any 171 annual filing or reporting requirements on an organization 172 regulated or specifically exempted from regulation under this 173 chapter which are more burdensome than the requirements 174 authorized by Florida law. 175 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to state grants or 176 contracts or to fraud investigations. 177 (c)âThis subsection does not restrict enforcement actions 178 against specific nonprofit organizations. 179 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.